Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-534
Wild turkeys; tagging and storage of carcasses; regulations.

The commission shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations for the tagging and storage of the carcasses of wild turkeys after the close of any such limited season in accordance with section 37-508.

Laws 1961, c. 172, § 2, p. 513;

R.S.1943, (1993), § 37-228;

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 254.